Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1005.
do enact as follows:AB1005,1Section 1. 36.11 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:36.11 (3) (a) Subject to sub. subs. (3m) and (3r), the board shall establish the policies for admission within the system and within these policies each institution shall establish specific requirements for admission to its courses of instruction. No sectarian or partisan tests or any tests based upon race, religion, national origin of U.S. citizens or sex shall ever be allowed in the admission of students thereto.AB1005,2Section 2. 36.11 (3r) of the statutes is created to read:36.11 (3r) Objective criteria for admission. (a) In this subsection, “college entrance examination” means the ACT, as defined in s. 39.41 (9) (a) 1., the SAT, as defined in s. 39.41 (9) (a) 3., or a similar national or regional test for measuring college readiness.(b) The board shall ensure that undergraduate admission decisions at the University of Wisconsin-Madison are predominantly based on college entrance examination performance or similar objective testing measures. This paragraph does not apply with respect to applicants admitted through the guaranteed admission program under sub. (3m).AB1005,3Section 3. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to applications for admission for the 2027-28 academic year. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab1005 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab1005 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB1005 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB1005 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB1005: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting